sv: Broddmönster: 2-bults; 3-bults; 4-bults; 5-bults; Utan bult/rem; Annat
sl-SI: Vzorec vijakov za vpenjanje: 2 vijaka; 3 vijaki; 4 vijaki; 5 vijakov; Brez vijakov/trak; Drugo
tr: Krampon cıvata düzeni: 2 cıvatalı; 3 cıvatalı; 4 cıvatalı; 5 cıvatalı; Cıvatasız/kayışlı; Diğer
es: Patrón de pernos de la cala: 2 tornillos; 3 tornillos; 4 tornillos; 5 tornillos; Sin tornillos/con correa; Otro
lt-LT: Klipsų varžtų išdėstymas: 2 varžtų; 3 varžtų; 4 varžtų; 5 varžtų; Be varžtų / su dirželiu; Kita
ro-RO: Modelul șuruburilor plăcuței: 2 șuruburi; 3 șuruburi; 4 șuruburi; 5 șuruburi; Fără șurub/curea; Altele
ko: 클리트 볼트 패턴: 2볼트; 3볼트; 4볼트; 5볼트; 노볼트/스트랩; 기타
en: Cleat bolt pattern: 2-bolt; 3-bolt; 4-bolt; 5-bolt; No-bolt/strap; Other
zh-CN: 锁鞋锁片螺栓孔布局: 2 孔; 3 孔; 4 孔; 5 孔; 无孔/绑带; 其他
vi: Kiểu bắt vít đế giày: 2 bu-lông; 3 bu-lông; 4 bu-lông; 5 bu-lông; Không bu-lông/có dây đeo; Khác
pt-BR: Padrão de parafusos da presilha: 2 parafusos; 3 parafusos; 4 parafusos; 5 parafusos; Sem parafusos/correia; Outro
zh-TW: 鎖片螺栓孔位: 2 孔; 3 孔; 4 孔; 5 孔; 無孔/綁帶; 其他
it: Schema di fissaggio del bullone di fissaggio: 2 bulloni; 3 bulloni; 4 bulloni; 5 bulloni; Senza bulloni/cinghia; Altro
hr-HR: Uzorak vijaka za klinove: 2 vijka; 3 vijka; 4 vijka; 5 vijaka; Bez vijaka / remen; Ostalo
el: Μοτίβο μπουλονιού: 2 βιδών; 3 βιδών; 4 βιδών; 5 βιδών; Χωρίς βίδα/λουράκι; Άλλο
sk-SK: Rozvrhnutie skrutiek zarážky: 2-skrutkový; 3-skrutkový; 4-skrutkový; 5-skrutkový; Bez skrutiek/remienok; Iné
ru: Схема крепежных отверстий шипов: На 2 болта; На 3 болта; На 4 болта; На 5 болтов; Без болтов / ремешок; Другой
bg-BG: Разположение на отворите/болтовете за закрепване на клита.: С 2 болта; С 3 болта; С 4 болта; С 5 болта; Без болт/с каишка; Друго
nb: Boltmønster for klosser: 2-bolts; 3-bolts; 4-bolts; 5-bolts; Uten bolt / reim; Annet
th: รูปแบบรูยึดแผ่นคลีท: 2 น็อต; 3 น็อต; 4 น็อต; 5 น็อต; ไม่มีน็อต/สายรัด; อื่นๆ
ja: クリートボルトパターン: 2つ穴; 3つ穴; 4つ穴; 5つ穴; ボルトなし/ストラップ; その他
fr: Entraxe des boulons de crampon: 2 boulons; 3 boulons; 4 boulons; 5 boulons; Sans boulon/courroie; Autre
cs: Rozteč šroubů hrotů golfových bot: 2 šrouby; 3 šrouby; 4 šrouby; 5 šroubů; Bez šroubů / popruh; Jiné
fi: Klossin pulttikuvio: 2-pulttinen; 3-pulttinen; 4-pulttinen; 5-pulttinen; Pultiton/hihna; Muu
pl: Rozstaw śrub bloków: Na 2 śruby; Na 3 śruby; Na 4 śruby; Na 5 śrub; Bez śrub / na pasek; Inny
hu: Stoplicsavar mintája: 2 csavaros; 3 csavaros; 4 csavaros; 5 csavaros; Csavar nélküli/pántos; Egyéb
da: Boltmønster til klamper: 2-bolt; 3-bolt; 4-bolt; 5-bolt; Uden bolt/rem; Andet
nl: Schoenplaatje boutpatroon: 2-bouts; 3-bouts; 4-bouts; 5-bouts; Zonder bout/band; Anders
de: Lochmuster der Schuhplatte: 2-Loch; 3-Loch; 4-Loch; 5-Loch; Ohne Schrauben/mit Riemen; Sonstige
pt-PT: Padrão de pernos de fixação: 2 parafusos; 3 parafusos; 4 parafusos; 5 parafusos; Sem parafusos/correia; Outro